New York, session 2025-2026, S4300.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 207-b to 2 read as follows: 3 § 207-b. Volunteer firefighter and ambulance worker job protection. 1. 4 It shall be unlawful for any employer or such employer's duly authorized 5 agent to discharge or in any other manner discriminate against an 6 employee as to their employment because they have responded to an emer- 7 gency when acting as a volunteer firefighter or volunteer ambulance 8 worker. 9 2. For purposes of this section: 10 (a) Volunteer firefighter shall have the same meaning as defined in 11 subdivision one of section three of the volunteer firefighters' benefit 12 law; and 13 (b) Volunteer ambulance worker shall have the same meaning as defined 14 in subdivision one of section three of the volunteer ambulance workers' 15 benefit law. 16 3. For the purposes of this section, "responding to an emergency" 17 shall mean: 18 (a) when a volunteer firefighter participates in necessary travel to, 19 working at, and necessary travel returning from a fire, alarm of fire, 20 hazardous material incident or other emergency to which their fire 21 department, fire company, any unit thereof, either has responded or 22 would be required or authorized to respond, including necessary travel 23 during such work or incidental thereto; or 24 (b) when a volunteer ambulance worker participates in necessary travel 25 to, working at, and necessary travel returning from an accident, alarm EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08047-01-5 S. 4300 2 1 of accident, or other duty to which their ambulance department, ambu- 2 lance company, or any unit thereof, either has responded or would be 3 required or authorized to respond, including necessary travel during 4 such work or incidental thereto. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.